Utah statutes.
48-3a-1045.   Statement of conversion.

(1)  A statement of conversion must be signed by the converting entity and delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  A statement of conversion must contain:

(a)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converting entity;

(b)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

(c)  if the converting entity is a domestic entity, a statement that the plan of conversion was approved in accordance with Sections 48-3a-1041 through 48-3a-1046 or, if the converting entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the conversion was approved by the foreign converting entity in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

(d)  if the converted entity is a domestic filing entity, the text of its public organic record, as an attachment;

(e)  if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, the text of its statement of qualification, as an attachment; and

(f)  if the converted entity is a foreign entity that is not a registered foreign entity, a mailing address to which the division may send any process served on the division pursuant to Subsection 48-3a-1046(5).

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (2), a statement of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

(4)  If a converted entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, but the public organic record does not need to be signed.

(5)  A plan of conversion that is signed by a domestic converting entity and meets all the requirements of Subsection (2) may be delivered to the division for filing instead of a statement of conversion and on filing has the same effect.  If a plan of conversion is filed as provided in this Subsection (5), references in this part to a statement of conversion refer to the plan of conversion filed under this Subsection (5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

